src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON 2v_stems !!= * @CODE@ = 2-syllabic verbs with CV reduplication
halu vtags "sweep forcefully" ; ! hahalu
tē:tee vtags "Be bulging, stick" ; ! XXX
ao:ao tvtags "Collect, gather." ;
ake:ake tvtags "Be washed" ;
ako:ako tvtags "Learn" ;
apo:apo vtags "Heed, regard" ;
ilo:ilo tvtags "Assort, sort" ;
inu:inu vtags "Drink. Inu" ;
uku:uku vtags "Rub oil on" ;
ifo:ifo vtags "bow down" ;
fai:fai tvtags "Do. Fai" ;
kai:kai tvtags "Eat" ;
kao:kao vtags "Adze out, chisel" ;
lua:lua vtags "Vomit, spew. N" ;
mai:mai tvtags "Be salty," ;
mau:mau tvtags "Be satisfied," ;
heu:heu vtags "Steer, drive," ;
tau:tau vtags "A n" ;
fano:fano vsg "(pi. olo). ." ;
fano:olo vpl "(pi. olo). ." ;
fehi:fehi vtags "Eng. first Play" ;
fuli:fuli vtags "Be overturned." ;
gape:gape vtags "(pi. tagape). Prise" ;
goto:goto vtags "(pi. gogoto). ." ;
kehe:kehe tvtags "Be changed," ;
kite:kite tvtags "Look at," ;
kona:kona vtags "Be salty." ;
laki:laki vtags "Eng. lucky. Be" ;
leua:leua vtags "Be touched accidentally." ;
lole:lole vtags "Deal with s.th." ;
lolo:lolo tvtags "(of a fisherman" ;
maua:maua vtags "ear, u" ;
mili:mili vtags "R ub." ;
muta:muta vtags "Be disco n" ;
nofo:nofo vtags "(pi. nonofo). ." ;
pelu:pelu vtags "(of waves)." ;
pihi:pihi vtags "Eng. busy. Busy." ;
puke:puke tvtags "Grab, take" ;
pupu:pupu vtags "(of one’s mind)." ;
hala:hala vtags "(of small fry," ;
haha:haha vtags "(of grass and" ;
hipa:hipa vtags "Be at an" ;
holi:holi tvtags "Tread on, walk" ;
hulu:hulu vtags "Seek refuge o" ;
taku:taku tvtags "Tell. Taku" ;
tala:tala vtags "Pull dow" ;
tali:tali tvtags "Fetch, collect. Fano" ;
tili:tili vtags "Bind, w ind" ;
vale:vale vtags "Be totally absorbed" ;
ino:ino vtags "Fall face down." ;
hika:hika vtags "Make a fire" ;
LEXICON 3v_stems!!= * @CODE@ = 3-syllabic verbs with CV reduplication
mativa:ma^R^Etiva vtags ; ! matitiva
āmo:aamo vtags "(of the sea)." ;
ikā:ikaa vtags "Be abounding with" ;
ahua:ahua vtags "Be smoky," ;
auata:auata vtags "Be" ;
aloua:aloua vtags "Contain pus." ;
fafao:fafao vtags "Put s.th. into" ;
fofou:fofou tvtags "want," ;
fufui:fufui vtags "Dip (into water" ;
gaohi:gaohi tvtags "Make, produce, manufacture." ;
kaina:kaina vtags "Be occupied, be" ;
lalao:lalao vtags "ut one’s" ;
limua:limua vtags "Be mossy or" ;
mafai:mafai tvtags "Be able to" ;
mamae:mamae vtags "Be sore," ;
mounu:mounu vtags "Be detach ed" ;
nonoa:nonoa vtags "(pi. tanoa). ." ;
popoa:popoa vtags "Be abounding with" ;
hahae:hahae vtags "(pl. tahae). Tear," ;
holoi:holoi vtags "(o f a" ;
taupe:taupe vtags "ang, swing." ;
tauhi:tauhi tvtags "ook after," ;
tapui:tapui vtags "Be placed" ;
tavae:tavae vtags "ove s.th" ;
tiaki:tiaki tvtags "et aw" ;
tutua:tutua vtags "Be o f" ;
vikia:vikia vtags "Be com" ;
fafagu:fafagu vtags "ake or" ;
fefetu:fefetu vtags "Roll up (one" ;
fufuli:fufuli vtags "(pi. tafuli). ." ;
gatata:gatata vtags "Be torn." ;
kakapu:kakapu vtags "Bulge out, fill" ;
kikili:kikili vtags "File (or" ;
lalama:lalama vtags "Fish for flying-fish" ;
lolofi:lolofi vtags "(of body," ;
lulupe:lulupe vtags "Have a whitish" ;
mafuti:mafuti vtags "(o f" ;
makuku:makuku vtags "(o f th" ;
malole:malole vtags "Be successful in" ;
mapuna:mapuna vtags "(o f back)." ;
mataga:mataga vtags "(pi. maatagataga). Becom" ;
memege:memege vtags "Shiver, shrivel. F" ;
mumuni:mumuni tvtags "ide, conceal." ;
nunuti:nunuti vtags "(o f paper" ;
papanu:papanu vtags "(of paint etc.)." ;
pipihi:pipihi vtags "(of liquid)." ;
hagole:hagole vtags "Search, rummage, sift" ;
hakili:hakili tvtags "Search for, seek" ;
hahala:hahala vtags "(of smell or" ;
hehepa:hehepa vtags "Be cross-eyed. Haaloa" ;
tafahi:tafahi vtags "Seek, search for" ;
tamate:tamate vtags "Kill, slaughter." ;
teteke:teteke tvtags "Refuse, decline." ;
titipi:titipi vtags "C u" ;
tulali:tulali vtags "Be w orn" ;
veveni:veveni vtags "Sam. veveni). Be" ;
agoago:agoago vtags "Observe, watch attentively." ;
onoono:onoono vtags "Come through," ;
fiuelo:fiuelo vtags "(slang). Be really" ;
tauala:tauala vtags "Keep w atch," ;
inohia:inohia vtags "Be hated, be" ;
ufitia:ufitia vtags "Be covered, be" ;
LEXICON v_div
alaala':alaala' vtags "Sit up and" ;
i:i vtags "(of the" ; ! XXX
ōpea:oopea vtags "Float, drift. Kikila" ;
obedience,:obedience, vtags "Obey. Uhitaki ki" ;
fainuku:fainuku vtags "Be concerned about" ;
fāgamoa:faagamoa vtags "Feed chickens. Na" ;
fakaāfu:fakaaafu vtags "Make s.o. sweat" ;
fakaali:fakaali tvtags "Show. Fakaali" ;
fakaata:fakaata vtags "Aim, point, sight" ;
fakaogohia:fakaogohia vtags "Deliberately hurt or" ;
fakaulu:fakaulu vtags "Make to go" ;
fakafeagai:fakafeagai vtags "Be opposite to," ;
fakafiti:fakafiti vtags "Deny. K" ;
fakagaholo:fakagaholo vtags "Speed up, make" ;
fakakelekelea:fakakelekelea vtags "Cause to be" ;
fakakino:fakakino tvtags "Destroy," ;
fakalālā:fakalaalaa vtags "Make s.th." ;
fakaliliu:fakaliliu vtags "(See liliu" ;
fakamautū:fakamautuu vtags "Cause s.th. to" ;
fakamāgalo:fakamaagalo tvtags "Rinse o" ;
fakamalie:fakamalie vtags "(pi. fakamaalilie). Please" ;
fakamāhohofa:fakamaahohofa vtags "(See fakamahofa)." ;
fakamimiha:fakamimiha vtags "(of the" ;
fakapele:fakapele vtags "Do favours for" ;
fakapōuli:fakapoouli vtags "Shade. E fakapouli" ;
fakapulupulu:fakapulupulu vtags "Cover s.o" ;
fakahao:fakahao tvtags "Save, rescue, preserve," ;
fakahaoloto:fakahaoloto tvtags "Set free, let" ;
fakahaohaoa:fakahaohaoa tvtags "(of boat). Cause" ;
fakahahana:fakahahana vtags "Cause to gush" ;
fakahoehā:fakahoehaa vtags "Cause annoyance, disturb." ;
trading,:trading, vtags "Buy, sell. (n.b." ;
fakataunuku:fakataunuku tvtags "Make s.o." ;
fakatafi:fakatafi vtags "Make the bowels" ;
fakatamatāne:fakatamataane vtags "Be brave, have" ;
fakatino:fakatino tvtags "Put into" ;
fakatō:fakatoo vtags "Make s.th." ;
fakatotoka:fakatotoka vtags "Make s.th." ;
fakatupu:fakatupu tvtags "Make s.o. a" ;
fakatutua:fakatutua vtags "Resist with a" ;
fakavevehi:fakavevehi vtags "Upset, cause a" ;
fatufatu:fatufatu tvtags "Build up" ;
feākihi:feaakihi vtags "Eng. kiss, (of" ;
fekainaki:fekainaki vtags "Be angry and" ;
fetāliaki:fetaaliaki vtags "Exchange words" ;
foulua:foulua vtags "Be" ;
fulialo:fulialo vtags "Face forw ard," ;
gapā:gapaa vtags "Crack, burst, explode." ;
kaihoatia:kaihoatia vtags "Be stolen. Kua" ;
kāmata:kaamata vtags "e g" ;
kilikilimamae:kilikilimamae vtags "Have a sore" ;
kupumamao:kupumamao vtags "(of fruits o" ;
lagolago:lagolago vtags "Support, rest." ;
lialiaki:lialiaki vtags "Wave. Lialiaki" ;
logologo:logologo vtags "Tell everyone, i.e." ;
lotogalue:lotogalue vtags "Be ready and" ;
mauafua:mauafua vtags "Receive o r" ;
māfuta:maafuta vtags "(o f" ;
satisfaction,:satisfaction, vtags "Be sweet." ;
manakomia:manakomia vtags "Be needed, be" ;
mātafitafi:maatafitafi vtags "ade slowly," ;
matamamafa:matamamafa vtags "p p" ;
māvaevae:maavaevae vtags "Be cracked" ;
mūimui:muuimui vtags "Criticize s.o. behind" ;
noatia:noatia vtags "Be b" ;
nofohāuni:nofohaauni tvtags "Be prepared, be" ;
palalū:palaluu vtags "(pl. paalalu). ." ;
pihapihaō:pihapihaoo vtags "ake a" ;
potopoto:potopoto vtags "Congregate, assemble. Kua" ;
haehae:haehae vtags "Tear into pieces." ;
hākenukenu:haakenukenu vtags "l.K ick about" ;
hanahana:hanahana vtags "Flow out little" ;
helehele:helehele tvtags "Reap, harvest, gather." ;
hēiō:heeioo vtags "Eng. sail ahoy." ;
hogitia:hogitia vtags "(of a smell)." ;
hukehuke:hukehuke vtags "tudy, questio" ;
taikia:taikia vtags "Be caught, be" ;
taufakalili:taufakalili vtags "Tease. Nahe" ;
tāupule:taaupule vtags "iscuss, plan" ;
tautuku:tautuku vtags "eep an" ;
tagolima:tagolima vtags "o well," ;
tākele:taakele vtags "athe, have" ;
takutaku:takutaku tvtags "mention frequently." ; ! xxx -a?
talanoa:talanoa vtags "Discuss, talk. Fano" ;
taluai:taluai vtags "Be recent, be" ;
tāvaka:taavaka vtags "b an" ;
tipitipi:tipitipi vtags "hop, cut," ;
tūlau':tuulau' vtags "u ote," ;
vaohia:vaohia vtags "Be stopped from" ;
vatavata:vatavata vtags "Be full o" ;
hāuni:hāuni tvtags "be ready" ;
kaumai:kaumai tvtags "bring" ;
kavatu:kavatu tvtags "send" ;
vēnei:vēnei vtags "be like this" ;
tautala:tautala vsg "talk" ;
tautala:tāutatala vpl "talk" ;
